Georgia, session 2025_26, HB251.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 26 of Title 43 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to nurses, is
amended by revising Code Section 43-26-11.1, relating to administration of anesthesia by
certified registered nurse anesthetist, as follows:
"43-26-11.1.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Anesthesia plan' means a plan for anesthesia care, including, but not limited to,
evaluating a patient, referring a patient to other healthcare providers when necessary,
H. B. 251
- 1 -

LC 52 0644
choosing the appropriate anesthetic agent and technique, and ordering medications and
tests before, during, and after the administration of anesthesia.
(2) 'Coordination' means the process in which a physician and certified registered nurse
anesthetist work together to manage a patient's care, including, but not limited to, sharing
information, discussing a patient's diagnosis, condition, and treatment, and developing
and modifying an anesthesia plan to ensure the best possible delivery of healthcare.
(b) In any case where it is lawful for a duly licensed physician practicing medicine under
the laws of this state to administer anesthesia, such anesthesia and an anesthesia plan may
be ordered and administered by a certified registered nurse anesthetist, provided that such
anesthesia is administered under the direction and responsibility of a duly licensed
physician in coordination with a physician licensed to practice medicine in this state.
(c) Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to restrict the authority of a healthcare
facility to adopt policies relating to the provision of anesthesia.
(d) A physician licensed to practice medicine in this state who is not providing the delivery
of anesthesia shall not be liable for an act or omission of a certified registered nurse
anesthetist administering anesthesia pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 251
- 2 -